Utah statutes.
72-7-306.   Limited highways -- Penalty for driving animals over.
(1) A highway authority may declare a public highway that is laid out through
improved lands that are not protected by fences along the lines of the highway
passing through it, to be limited highways. A notice to that effect shall be
posted at each end of a limited highway.
(2)  A person who willfully drives any band or herd of domestic animals over a
limited highway except during the time that the abutting lands are thrown open
to the public by the owners for grazing purposes, is guilty of a class B
misdemeanor.
